Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNION GOSPEL MISSION TWIN CITIES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Union Gospel Mission Twin Cities, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the design and construction of a new women and children's family shelter and transitional housing at 376 Western Avenue in the city of St. Paul and for capital improvements at the men's campus at 435 University Avenue East in the city of St. Paul. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end